Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB918.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentences for persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.(a) Mandatory minimum sentence.--(1) A person convicted under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(a) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms) as a result of a conviction under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(b) shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of at least 11 months.(2) The mandatory term of imprisonment under paragraph (1) shall not apply if the felony conviction under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 was because the person was subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 12345678910111213141516171819 6105(c)(3).(3) If a person is convicted under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 and the offense is graded as a felony, the person shall be sentenced to a minimum sentence of at least five years of total confinement if the person had previously been convicted under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 during the commission of the current offense. Upon a second conviction under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105, the court shall give the person oral and written notice of the penalties under this section for a third conviction for a crime of violence. F ailure to provide the notice under this paragraph shall not render the offender ineligible to be sentenced under paragraph (4).(4) If the person had previously been convicted of two or more violations of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 arising from separate criminal actions during the commission of the current offense, the person shall be sentenced to a minimum sentence of at least 15 years of total confinement. Proof that the offender received notice of or otherwise knew or should have known of the penalties under this paragraph shall not be required.(b) Mandatory maximum sentence.--An offender sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence under subsection (a) shall be sentenced to a maximum sentence equal to twice the mandatory minimum sentence, notwithstanding 18 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to sentence of imprisonment for felony) or another provision of this title or other statute.(c) Eligibility for parole.--Parole under this section may not be granted until the minimum term of imprisonment is served.(d) Application of mandatory minimum penalty.--(1) For a provision of this section that requires 20250SB0918PN1094 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 imposition of a mandatory minimum sentence based on a fact that is not an element of the underlying offense or a prior conviction, the enhancing element must be:(i) proven beyond a reasonable doubt at trial on the underlying offense; and(ii) submitted to the fact-finder for deliberation together with the underlying offense. If the fact-finder finds the defendant guilty of the underlying offense, the fact-finder shall decide whether an enhancing element has been proven.(2) For a provision of this section that requires imposition of a mandatory minimum sentence and that is not covered by paragraph (1):(i) The enhancing element may not be an element of the crime.(ii) Notice of the crime to the defendant shall not be required prior to conviction, but reasonable notice of the Commonwealth's intention to proceed under this section must be provided after conviction and before sentencing.(3) The applicability of this section shall be determined at sentencing.(4) Prior to imposing sentence on an offender under this section, the sentencing court must have a complete record of the previous convictions of the offender, and copies of the record must be furnished to the offender.(5) If the offender or Commonwealth contests the accuracy of the record under paragraph (4), the court shall schedule a hearing and direct the offender and Commonwealth to submit evidence regarding the previous convictions of the 20250SB0918PN1094 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offender.(6) For a hearing under paragraph (5), the court shall determine the previous convictions of the offender by a preponderance of the evidence.(7) If the court finds that this section is applicable, the court shall impose a sentence in accordance with this section.(8) If a previous conviction is vacated and an acquittal or final discharge entered after imposition of sentence under this section, the offender may petition the sentencing court for reconsideration of the sentence if this section would have been inapplicable except for the vacated conviction.(e) Appeal by Commonwealth.--(1) If a sentencing court fails to apply this section where applicable, including if the fact-finder found an enhancing element and a sentencing court imposes a sentence below the mandatory minimum sentence, the Commonwealth shall have the right to appellate review of the sentence.(2) I f the appellate court finds that the sentence was imposed in violation of this section, t he appellate court shall vacate the sentence and remand the case to the sentencing court for imposition of a sentence in accordance with this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0918PN1094 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324